Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 29 Reciprocity Agreements

31-29-1.
Reciprocity board established.

There is established a reciprocity board, referred to in this chapter as “the board”. The board shall be composed of three (3) members, consisting of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, the chair of the public utilities commission, and an assistant attorney general designated by the attorney general, ex officio. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum and the action of the majority of the members in attendance at any meeting shall be the action of the board. Whenever a member of the board is absent from a meeting of the board, the member may designate one of his or her assistants or employees to attend on the member’s behalf. The assistant or employee shall be entitled to participate in the discussions and proceedings of the board, but he or she shall not be entitled to vote.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2386, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-29-1

.

31-29-2.
Entry into reciprocal agreements — Scope of agreements.

The governor is authorized, with the advice of the board, to enter into reciprocal agreements on behalf of the state, with the appropriate authorities of any state in the United States of America, or of the District of Columbia, or of any province in the dominion of Canada, with respect to all fees or taxes imposed by this state and by any other state, or the District of Columbia, or any province of Canada, on motor vehicles, or on the operation of motor vehicles, or upon any transaction incident to the operation of motor vehicles. It shall be the duty of the board to study and advise the governor with respect to all matters affecting any reciprocal agreements.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2386, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-29-2

; P.L. 1996, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 197, § 1.

31-29-3.
Authority exercised by governor.

All authority previously vested in the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and the public utilities administrator, in respect to determining the privileges granted to nonresident owners and operators of motor vehicles, in registration of motor vehicles, licenses of operators, or fees incidental to public utilities permits and plates, is transferred and vested in the governor, subject, however, to the provisions of §§

31-29-1

and

31-29-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2386, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-29-3

.

31-29-4.
Agreements subject to statutes — Discretion of governor.

All agreements entered into by the governor with respect to any subject as to which provision is expressly made by statute shall conform to the provisions of the statute. As to any other subject of reciprocity appropriate to the powers vested in the governor by this chapter, the governor shall have full authority, with the advice of the board, to agree to any terms and conditions that in the governor’s judgment are best calculated to promote the interests of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2386, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-29-4

.

31-29-5.
Disability parking reciprocity agreements.

The reciprocity board is authorized to enter into reciprocity agreements with any state in the United States of America or the District of Columbia concerning parking privilege for individuals with disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 73; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 73.

31-29-6.
Driver License Compact Reciprocity Agreement.

The governor is authorized to enter the Driver License Compact Reciprocity Agreement in order to improve standardization and compatibility in driver licensing operations throughout the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 284, § 1.